Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.013

Substitute teachers—Application for service credit—Procedures.

Substitute teachers may apply to the department to receive service credit or credit for earnable compensation or both after the end of the last day of instruction of the school year during which the service was performed.

(1) The application must:

(a) Include a list of the employers the substitute teacher has worked for;

(b) Include proof of hours worked and compensation earned; and

(c) Be made prior to retirement.

(2) If the department accepts the substitute teacher's application for service credit, the substitute teacher may obtain service credit by paying the required contribution to the retirement system. The employer must pay the required employer contribution upon notice from the department that the substitute teacher has made contributions under this section.

(3) The department shall charge interest prospectively on employee contributions that are submitted under this section more than six months after the end of the school year, as defined in *RCW 28A.150.040, for which the substitute teacher is seeking service credit. The interest rate charged to the employee shall take into account interest lost on employer contributions delayed for more than six months after the end of the school year.

(4) Each employer shall quarterly notify each substitute teacher it has employed during the school year of the number of hours worked by, and the compensation paid to, the substitute teacher.

(5) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

(6) If a substitute teacher as defined in **RCW 41.32.010(36)(b)(ii) applies to the department under this section for credit for earnable compensation earned from an employer the substitute teacher must make contributions for all periods of service for that employer.

[ 1992 c 212 s 16; 1991 c 343 s 4; 1990 c 274 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28A.150.040 was repealed by 2009 c 548 s 710, effective September 1, 2011.

**(2) RCW 41.32.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (36)(b)(ii) to subsection (48)(b)(ii).

Findings—Effective dates—1991 c 343: See notes following RCW 41.50.005.

Findings—Effective date—Construction—1990 c 274: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.